

	INVENSHURE Trademark of Invenshure, LLC. Serial Number: 85635731 :: Trademarkia Trademarks





























































Apply Online!
Attorneys

Services 

U.S. Trademark Registration Service 
International Trademark Registration Service 
Trademark Office Action Response 
Trademark Statement of Use 
Trademark Renewal 
Trademark Assignment 
Trademark Watch 
Trademark Cease & Desist  
Trademark Comprehensive Search  
Copyright Registration 
Patent Services 
Incorporation Services 
Business Page Creation 
 More Services... 


Help
Contact Us


Login






















Trademark Search 
Trademark Category
Insurance & Financial Services
INVENSHURE










 
Get FREE email alerts













INVENSHURE  Trademark Information
 Invenshure, LLC
Business incubation services, namely, providing financing to technology start-ups; financial and investment services related to business incubation, namely, venture capital fund management, funds investment, intellectual property venture fund development and formation services for others, intellectual property venture fund management services, fund investment consultation, and investment fund transfer; all of the foregoing excluding insurance ...




Perfect for these industries

Insurance & Financial Services





Words that describe this mark
business   incubation   services         providing   financing   technology   startups   financial   investment   services   related   business   incubation         venture   capital   fund   management      funds   investment      intellectual    
                                    




This is a brand page for the INVENSHURE trademark by Invenshure, LLC 
                                in Minneapolis, MN, 55405.
Write a review about a product or service associated with this INVENSHURE trademark.    
                                Or, contact the owner Invenshure, LLC of the INVENSHURE trademark by filing a request to communicate with    
                                the Legal Correspondent for licensing, use, and/or questions related to the INVENSHURE trademark.
                           






On Friday, May 25, 2012,  a U.S. federal trademark registration was filed for 
                        INVENSHURE by 
                        Invenshure, LLC, Minneapolis, MN  55405.
                        The USPTO has given the INVENSHURE 
                        trademark serial  number of  85635731.  
                        The current federal status of this trademark filing is REGISTERED.
                        The correspondent listed for INVENSHURE is 
                        
                        
                                            MARTHA J ENGEL of 
                                            WINTHROP & WEINSTINE,  225 S 6TH ST, MINNEAPOLIS, MN 55402-4601 
                                .
                            The INVENSHURE trademark is filed in the category of 
                            
                                    Insurance & Financial Services
                                . 
                            The description provided to the USPTO for INVENSHURE 
                            is Business incubation services, namely, providing financing to technology start-ups; financial and investment services related to business incubation, namely, venture capital fund management, funds investment, intellectual property venture fund development and formation services for others, intellectual property venture fund management services, fund investment consultation, and investment fund transfer; all of the foregoing excluding insurance brokerage services. 
                            





Word mark:
 INVENSHURE


  Status/Status Date:  


REGISTERED

2/25/2014



  Serial Number:  
85635731


  Filing Date:  
5/25/2012


 Registration Number:  
4486978 


 Registration Date:  
2/25/2014


 Goods and Services: 
Business incubation services, namely, providing financing to technology start-ups; financial and investment services related to business incubation, namely, venture capital fund management, funds investment, intellectual property venture fund development and formation services for others, intellectual property venture fund management services, fund investment consultation, and investment fund transfer; all of the foregoing excluding insurance brokerage services


 Mark Description: 
NOT AVAILABLE


 Type Of Mark: 
Service Mark


 Published For Opposition Date: 
12/10/2013


Last Applicant/Owner:

Invenshure, LLCMinneapolis, MN  55405
Why is this contact information displayed?  

Why is this contact information displayed? [Close]
The USPTO makes this data available for search by the public so that individuals can locate ownership information for intellectual property, much the same way a county might make real estate property ownership information available.
Since our website is synchronized with the USPTO data, we recommend making any data changes with the USPTO directly. Our website will auto-update when the USPTO data is updated.
You may also contact Trademarkia to make a request for the removal of your personally identifiable information or trademark data.  Such requests must be made in writing and will be subject to verification of ownership.  This policy allows verified trademark owners to specify: (A) that their identifiable information be masked, or (B) that their trademark pages permanently deleted from Trademarkia.com.  
                                                Requests may be made directly to customer.service@trademarkia.com and every effort will be made to honor them within 48 hours. 
Click here for further details.
[Close]




 Mark Drawing Code:  
Standard Character Mark


 Design Search: 


(NO DATA)



Register Type:  
Principal


 Disclaimer:
 (NOT AVAILABLE)


 Correspondent:


MARTHA J ENGEL
WINTHROP & WEINSTINE
225 S 6TH ST
MINNEAPOLIS, MN 55402-4601






 Use in Commerce Trademark - Applicant has provided proof of use of this mark in commerce to USPTO.





Classification Information



Primary Class: 
 Class (036) - Insurance; financial affairs; monetary affairs; real estate affairs. 


First Use Anywhere: 
5/5/2008


First Use In Commerce: 
5/5/2008





Trademarkia is the largest search engine for U.S. trademarks.  Each month hundreds of trademarks around the world are filed by licensed attorneys in the LegalForce/Trademarkia network! You can register your trademark in 170+ countries in the world through LegalForce Network.
 LegalForce Network can help you incorporate a business around your INVENSHURE trademark in less than 5 minutes.  Trademarkia makes the process easy and convenient, so start now!
 Trademarkia.com is a free search engine of publicly available government records.  Trademarkia.com is not a law firm and does not represent owners & correspondents listed on this page.
Trademark Document Retrieval >>







Trademark - Apply Online!


100% Satisfaction Guarantee protect your valuable brand now.



How it works?
What you get?






1. Legalforce RAPC - #1 U.S. Trademark Filing from 2010 to now.
2. Describe how your business or product is being used. Register your mark in 176+ countries. Just $199 + govt fees! Start here >>






1. Top Global IP Attorneys - Credibility and Experience!
2. All processes will be performed in a timely manner. You will be informed periodically about the process.






Keep Track of this Brand.

 Trademark Watch Services
Keep track of how your trademark is being used. Available in the United States and in more than 176 countries. Round-the-clock monitoring. Monthly report on potential infringement.
                                

Watch this Trademark 

Trademark Watch Services read more...

Current Trademark Status:

2/25/2014
REGISTERED


Free Trademark Search:






Correspondent Search:



MARTHA J ENGEL


                                             
                                         is a correspondent of INVENSHURE trademark. 
                            	    


Current Overall Rating:

 (0 review)
                            
What You Can Do:




Start Your Business



FREE Logo Creator



Add to Favorites



View Documents



FREE Trademark Search



Start Trademark Filing Process



Protect this Mark Internationally



Custom Logo Design $159



Search invenshure on popular social networks






                                Trademarkia lets you see how your 
                                personal name, product name, 
                                trademark name or username is being used on any of 530+ new 
                                and popular social networks.  
                                Be the first to reserve your name  and get help stopping others from using it - all in one place!















Trademark Oppose Service


You can request for Extension of Time to Oppose this mark or Oppose it now.



                 - If you are new to LegalForce/Trademarkia, please just enter your contact email and create a password;
                 

                 - If you already have a LegalForce/Trademarkia account, please enter your account's email and password.
                


* Email Address: 


 Please enter your email address



* Enter Password: 


 Please enter your password



* 



 Please enter the value




 

  
                             



 







Status Update Alerts

Status Update Alerts are email updates of the latest trademark status change. Please make sure you provide the correct email. 


                 - If you are new to LegalForce/Trademarkia, please just enter your contact email and create a password;
                 

                 - If you already have a LegalForce/Trademarkia account, please enter your account's email and password.
                


* Email Address: 


 Please enter your email address



* Enter Password: 


 Please enter your password



* 



 Please enter the value




 

  
                             



 









Review & Rating

Please Rate and Review for INVENSHURE 




INVENSHURE is providing Business incubation services, namely, providing financing to technology start-ups; financial and investment services related to business incubation, namely, venture capital fund management, funds investment, intellectual property venture fund development and formation services for others, intellectual property venture fund management services, fund investment consultation, and investment fund transfer; all of the foregoing excluding insurance brokerage services.
                


                 - If you are new to LegalForce/Trademarkia, please just enter your contact email and create a password to be associated with your review.
                 

                 If you already have a LegalForce/Trademarkia account, please enter your account's email and password before posting your review.
                 


* Please Rate: 


     




* Your Review: 



 Please enter your review.



* Email Address: 


 Please enter your email address



* Enter Password: 


 Please enter your password



 

  
                             



 




















Bizapedia.com - Human Validation
















COMPANIESPEOPLEPRODUCTS/SERVICESTRADEMARKSADDRESSESPHONE BOOK




            Our system has detected a high number of page requests from your IP Address, please prove to us that you are a human to continue using our website.
        
























                            Please send me to the search subscription offer page after I successfully answer the word challenge.
                        









BIZAPEDIAPRO SEARCHPerform unlimited searches via ouradvanced search form withBizapedia Pro Search.FIND OUT MORE >BIZAPEDIAPRO DATABuild custom data listsfor one or many stateswith Bizapedia Pro Data.FIND OUT MORE >


Copyright © 2012-2017 · Bizapedia.com · All rights reserved.BlogPro SearchPro APIContact UsTerms of UsePrivacy PolicySitemapDesktop Version














 QuickCorps.Com | Form an LLC or incorporate for business online today
































Incorporate Now















Launch Your Business 
With Speed And Value


Packages starting at $39 plus state filing fees.
Free 1st Year Registered Agent. 
All orders include free shipping.

Get Started











Start Your Business In 3 Easy Steps






1


Select a Package
We provide a side by side comparison of each of our packages. Select the package that is most suitable to your business needs.






2


Complete Order Form
Provide information about your company based on the selected state of incorporation.






3


Receive Your Documents
We do the work for you to draft your articles and work with the state to file your company. Upon completion we will mail your filed company formation documents to the address you provide.






What's included in each package?
See Plans & Pricing









How Does it Work

Once your order is placed we will begin processing the formation of your company. If additional information is required we will contact you for the necessary information. We handle your formation from beginning to end and make sure that your formation is filed quickly and correctly.





Review  Order Details

Every new order is reviewed for accuracy and conformity to state filing guidelines.



Name  Availability Search

A thorough name search is conducted with the state to ascertain the availability of the company name.



Prepare  and File Documents

Articles of Incorporation / Organization are prepared and delivered to the governing state agency.



Deliver  Filed Documents

The filed articles along with any additional services are mailed to the client.












Get a Quick Quote







Select Entity Type
LLC
S-Corporation
C-Corporation
Nonprofit






Select State
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
Washington DC
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming








Get Started Now














How can we help you?



Client Support 





Name *



Email Address *



Phone Number *



Message *





Send Message



Thanks for your message! We'll get back to you as soon as we can.

Send Other





























 



 Invenshure Launches Tychon Biosciences™ 
         










    










 






 











 









Invenshure Launches Tychon Biosciences™

		  Startup to develop and commercialize adaptive immunotherapy treatments for cancer
		

Oct 13, 2015, 08:07 ET
		  		  			
									 from   Invenshure, LLC 











 
















































 

 




















 






MINNEAPOLIS, Oct. 13, 2015 /PRNewswire/ -- Venture catalyst Invenshure announces the launch of Tychon Biosciences, a biotechnology company commercializing adaptive immunotherapy technology developed in the laboratory of Dr. Carston (Rick) Wagner at the University of Minnesota. 
Dr. Wagner, Professor and Endowed Chair in Medicinal Chemistry at the University of Minnesota and Director of the Chemical Biology Initiative, has developed a novel method to locate and kill specific cancers, utilizing protein-based nanorings, to "re-target" natural immune cells (T-Cells, NK cells).  Tychon holds the exclusive right to commercialize intellectual property related to Dr. Wagner's adaptive immunotherapy technology.
Tychon will complete pre-clinical animal studies currently in progress and design and execute manufacturing scale up, clinical trials and first-in-man studies.
"Tychon is buoyed by the meteoric trajectory of adaptive immunotherapy companies developing similar technologies.  We believe our technology is very complementary with our peers and offers some real advantages with respect to cost, safety and regulatory and clinical risk," said Danny Cunagin, CEO of Tychon.  "We are delighted to partner with Dr. Wagner and his team to commercialize this important technology that could offer significant relief to cancer patients."  
"This is our second technology commercialization partnership with Invenshure.  We are excited to see the work in Dr. Wagner's lab move toward the clinic, especially in an area of healthcare that could make a real difference in people's lives," said Rebecca Gerber, Marketing Manager for the Office for Technology Commercialization at the University of Minnesota. 
Tychon will be announcing several partnerships in the coming months related to its commercialization process.
The company will operate out of Invenshure's offices in Minneapolis until the needs of the organization dictate a transition to a more strategic location.
About Invenshure™Invenshure is a venture catalyst that scours university research labs for novel and disruptive technologies ready for commercialization. Invenshure partners with top scientists, physicians, and researchers from the most trusted institutions in healthcare and technology. The company focuses on high-growth sectors including biotech, genomics, healthcare IT, diagnostics, cloud computing technologies, and wireless technologies. For more information, visit http://invenshure.com.
About the Office for Technology CommercializationThe mission of the Office for Technology Commercialization is to facilitate the transfer of University of Minnesota research to licensees for the development of new products and services that benefit the public good, foster economic growth and generate revenue to support the University's research and education mission.
 
 SOURCE  Invenshure, LLC  

RELATED LINKS
http://invenshure.com



  

 View Table Fullscreen 




  View Table Fullscreen 





Journalists and Bloggers
The news you need, when you need it.
 
Join PR Newswire for Journalists to access all of the free services designated to make your job easier.
In need of subject matter experts for your story? Submit a free ProfNet request and find the sources you need.
LEARN MORE




 

 
 



















































  












Jul 22, 2015, 09:06 ET
Preview: Invenshure Portfolio Company, Exosite, Receives Parker Hannifin Equity Investment






My News


  Release contains wide tables.	  View fullscreen.





Looking to send a news release with PR Newswire?
Take advantage of the world's leading distribution platform.
Sign up to get started
Request more information
Have an account? Log In

 















Search











Searching for your content...









Advanced Search












































 


 















About OneOme - mission, leadership, advisors, and team.









































Oursolution


PRODUCTS
RESOURCES




For providers


Provider FAQ




For pharmacists


Pharmacist FAQ




For patients


Patient FAQ





Contact us

Log in

















OUR MISSION
Making   prescriptions   personal








 About us 
OneOme was established by Invenshure, LLC and Mayo Clinic to provide a comprehensive, cost-effective pharmacogenomic solution integrated into patients’ everyday clinical care. OneOme’s key product offering is the RightMed® pharmacogenomic test, a physician-ordered genetic test that predicts how a patient’s DNA and current prescriptions may affect their response to medications. The analysis is provided to the physician in the form of static and interactive reports that identifies which prescription drugs are — or aren’t — likely to work. This information can help providers make better prescription decisions, protect patients from adverse drug reactions and drug ineffectiveness, and reduce healthcare costs.
Our mission is to deliver the most cost-effective, comprehensive, clinically actionable pharmacogenomic (PGx) testing and tools for all providers and patients worldwide.








Leadership



JOHN L. BLACK III, M.D. — CO-FOUNDER
John L. Black III, M.D. is one of the co-founders of OneOme and also a consultant in the Division of Clinical Biochemistry and Immunology with a joint appointment in the Department of Psychiatry and Psychology at Mayo Clinic in Rochester. He joined the staff of Mayo Clinic in 1985 and is currently the co-director of the Personalized Genomics Laboratory. He received his B.A. and M.S. in psychology from the University of Wyoming.  He received his M.D. (cum laude) from Creighton University School of Medicine. He is board certified in general, geriatric, and addiction psychiatry and is a clinical chemist.  



PAUL OWEN — CHIEF EXECUTIVE OFFICER
Paul joined OneOme in August 2015 as President and Chief Operating Officer (COO). In June of 2016, Paul took on the role of Chief Executive Officer (CEO). Paul was previously at Invitae, a hereditary disease diagnostics company, where he  was responsible for developing and implementing the global commercialization team. Prior to Invitae, he led Mayo Medical Laboratories’ global commercial team for  10 years. Paul received his B.S. in business administration from the University of Wisconsin – Stout.



Jason Ross — CHIEF TECHNOLOGY OFFICER
Jason is the Chief Technology Officer with over 20 years of Healthcare Information Technology experience.  Prior to joining OneOme, Jason held the position of IT Section Head at Mayo Clinic and was responsible for leading their IT strategy for genomics, informatics and advanced analytics.   In addition, he was the Associate Director of IT for Mayo Clinic’s Center for Individualized Medicine.  Jason holds a B.S. in molecular biology from University of Wisconsin – Eau Claire and a M.A. in Healthcare Administration from St. Mary’s University of Minnesota.  



MARK SYLVESTER — CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER
Mark is currently the Chief Financial Officer (CFO) for OneOme and Invenshure, LLC. Previously, Mark was the CFO at The Emily Program, where he oversaw accounting, finance, payroll, and financial analytics. During his tenure, Mark sat on the board of directors, was a member of the senior leadership team, structured a debt and equity recapitalization, and was instrumental in business development during a period of rapid growth. Mark received his J.D. from the University of St. Thomas School of Law and B.A. from Saint John’s University.  



BRIAN ARENDT — DIRECTOR OF COMMERCIAL OPERATIONS
Brian joined OneOme as the Director of Commercial Operations in October 2015. Previously, he held management roles in operations, analytics, and IT for a genetic information company, diagnostic reference laboratory, and an integrated health system. Brian has a B.S. in marketing from Winona State University and an M.B.A. from the University of Wisconsin — La Crosse.



DIONE BAILEY — SENIOR DIRECTOR OF MARKETING
Dione is a senior marketing professional with over 14 years of genomics, genetics, life science, and diagnostic experience. Dione’s career has spanned a variety of roles and industries across startup companies such as Invitae and Complete Genomics as well as larger, more established organizations including Agilent, Affymetrix, and QIAGEN. Dione received her Ph.D. in biochemistry from the University of Delaware and completed her postdoc at Affymetrix.  



DON SKIFTER — VICE PRESIDENT OF NORTH AMERICAN SALES AND BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT
Don joined the OneOme team in May of 2016 as Director of East Sales and after making significant progress advancing OneOme's commercial efforts was subsequently promoted to Vice President of North American Sales and Business Development. Don has spent the past 15 years of his career in various commercial roles within genetic technology and services sectors including roles most recently at the Broad Institute where he helped launch Broad Genomic Services and at Complete Genomics, Sequenom, and Invitrogen/Life Technologies/Thermo Fisher prior to that. Don received his PhD in pharmacology and neuroscience from the University of Nebraska Medical Center and his MBA from the University of Nebraska Omaha. 



JASON SHEARD — DIRECTOR OF PRODUCT DEVELOPMENT
Jason is the Director of Product Development at OneOme. He is also the Director of Operations at Invenshure, LLC and is a technical leader with diverse product development experience, outstanding customer and engineering management skills, and a proven ability to build consensus and motivate teams to excel. Previously, he was the Vice President of Products for Logic PD, and before that he was Director of Electrical Engineering. Jason has a B.S. in physics from Bethel University and an M.S. in mechanical engineering from the University of Minnesota — Twin Cities.



JOSIAH ALLEN — DIRECTOR OF MEDICAL AFFAIRS
Josiah is the Director of Medical Affairs at Oneome, Josiah has over 8 years of experience in personalized medicine, including positions at Assurex Health and in the Mayo Clinic Department of Psychiatry & Psychology and Center for Individualized Medicine.  He is an author of over a dozen peer-reviewed publications in pharmacogenomics and has lectured extensively on clinical applications of pharmacogenomics to audiences of researchers, clinicians, and patients.  Josiah received his B.A. in psychology from Wheaton College (IL) and completed graduate work in molecular genetics at the University of Cincinnati.



JUSTIN ODEGAARD — LABORATORY DIRECTOR
Justin Odegaard joined OneOme in February 2016 as Laboratory Director.  Prior to OneOme, Justin was the Director of Molecular Pathology at Lifecode and is also the Laboratory Director and Senior Medical Director at Guardant Health.  Justin received his M.D. and Ph.D. from Stanford University, and trained at Stanford University Hospital in surgical and molecular pathology, where he remains as a part-time Instructor of Pathology.



MORGAN DONALDSON — DIRECTOR OF INTERNATIONAL BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT
Morgan joined OneOme as Director of International Business Development in April 2017. She has more than 10 years of experience in Sales and Business Development in early and mid stage medical device and molecular diagnostics companies. In her tenure at DNA Genotek, she developed key account strategies and pricing models, managed the international sales team, and established global sales channels (EU, APAC, EMEA and LATAM).  Morgan was most recently Director of Business Development at Centrillion Biosciences, a genomic sensor technology developer based in Palo Alto, CA. Morgan has a BSc. (Biology) from the University of Ottawa.



ROSS HIGGINS — DIRECTOR OF LABORATORY OPERATIONS
Ross Higgins joined OneOme in early 2016 and holds responsibility for organizing and directing laboratory operations for the company. Most recently, Ross served in a dual business development and product management role for Douglas Scientific, where he was responsible for driving both product development and market expansion efforts. Ross also brings extensive experience in the clinical laboratory field, owing to several years managing the molecular genetics department at a large, CAP-accredited reference laboratory. Ross has a B.S. in Clinical Laboratory Sciences and an M.B.A. from Virginia Commonwealth University. He also maintains ASCP certification as a Medical Laboratory Scientist.


Board members 




TROY KOPISCHKE — CO-FOUNDER AND CHAIRMAN OF THE BOARD
Troy is the co-founder and chairman of the board of OneOme. He is also a co-CEO, co-founder, and managing partner of Invenshure. Previously, he was the President and Chief Financial Officer at Steady State Imaging, where he was instrumental in developing a commercialization strategy that helped guide the sale of the company to GE Healthcare in 2011. Troy holds a B.S. in electrical engineering from the University of Minnesota as well as a B.A. in physics and a B.A. in engineering science from Bethel College.  



HARLAN LANGSTRAAT, RPh
Harlan joined OneOme to assist in business development activities related to Prescription Benefit Management organizations, Medication Therapy Management organizations, and other Pharmacy-related businesses. Harlan’s career has included senior management positions in for-profit and not-for-profit healthcare organizations. Most recently, Harlan managed the outpatient pharmacies, specialty pharmacy, and retail medical supply businesses at Mayo Clinic in Rochester, MN. Previously, Harlan held senior level management positions at a number of start-up healthcare companies including Quantum Health Resources and Caremark. Harlan has a B.S. in Pharmacy from South Dakota State University.



JEREMY FRIESE, M.D.
Jeremy is managing partner at Invenshure, an early-stage venture firm based in Minneapolis, and helped launch OneOme, for which he now serves as a director. He is an active investor and board member in the diagnostics and genomics arenas. Jeremy was an interventional radiologist at Mayo Clinic, where he also served as Associate Chair of the Department of Radiology and ran business development for Mayo Global Business Solutions. Jeremy earned his M.D. at Mayo Medical School and completed surgery and radiology training at Mayo Clinic and Harvard Medical School. He earned his M.B.A. from Harvard Business School.



KEITH STEWART, PhD
Dr. Keith Stewart is a consultant in the Division of Hematology and Oncology, Department of Internal Medicine at Mayo Clinic. He currently serves as the Carlson and Nelson Endowed Director of the Center for Individualized Medicine at Mayo Clinic and is recognized as the Vasek and Anna Maria Polak Professor of Cancer Research. His clinical practice and research focuses on genomics and individualized treatment of blood cancers such as multiple myeloma. Dr. Stewart earned his medical degree at Aberdeen University Medical School, United Kingdom, and an MBA degree at the University of Western Ontario.




Advisors 




BRONWYN HARTUNG, PhD — CLINICAL ADVISOR
Bronwyn is the founder of Phoenix Laboratory Consulting, based in Prospect, Kentucky. She has 15 years of experience in molecular genetics, with expertise in the design and validation of laboratory-developed tests, high-complexity clinical laboratory operations, quality systems, regulatory compliance, and medical device software. Her pharmacogenetics specialties include CYP450 haplotype and copy number analysis, data interpretation, and reporting. She earned her B.S. in Biology at Trinity University and her Ph.D. at Indiana University, followed by a postdoctoral fellowship in microbial pathology at the University of Iowa. 



JILL DAVIES — GENETIC COUNSELOR
Jill Davies is the Director of Genetics and Genomics at the Medcan Clinic. With over 15 years of experience in genetic counseling, Jill has developed a leading-edge genetics program at Medcan, providing a range of services, from classical genetics to genomics, including pharmacogenomic testing. Her special interest is in the role of genetics in primary care and preventive medicine.  



LIEWEI WANG, M.D., Ph.D. — MAYO CLINIC, Co-founder OneOme
Dr. Wang is a professor in the Department of Molecular Pharmacology and Experimental Therapeutics (MPET) at Mayo Clinic Rochester. Her research involves the application of high-throughput "omics" technologies to identify biomarkers that might help us individualize cancer therapies, understand mechanisms of drug action, and facilitate target identification and drug development. She is also a co-leader of the Mayo Pharmacogenomics Program within the Mayo CIM, where many of the projects involving personalized medicine have been conducted. She is the co-PI for the Mayo-NIH clinical pharmacology T32 training grant and the Associate Director for the Mayo MPET graduate program.  



RICHARD WEINSHILBOUM, M.D. — MAYO CLINIC, Co-founder OneOme
Dr. Weinshilboum received B.A. and M.D. degrees from the University of Kansas, followed by residency training in internal medicine at the Massachusetts General Hospital. He was also a pharmacology Research Associate at the National Institutes of Health (NIH). He began his affiliation with the Mayo Medical School and Mayo Clinic in 1972, where he is presently Professor of Pharmacology and Medicine and Mary Lou and John H. Dasburg Professor of Cancer Genomics Research. He currently directs the Pharmacogenomics Program of the Mayo Center for Individualized Medicine and is co-Principal Investigator of the long-standing US NIH Pharmacogenomics Research Network Center at the Mayo Clinic. 













Team 




Ben
Metzger



Colleen
Owen



Erin
Rech



Erik
Anderson



Erica
Schnettler



Hennessy
McIlvaine



Isabelle
Searcy



Jacob
Sevlie



Jake
Comstock



Kandace
Schuft



Kathleen
Bosse


 
Katie
Mittelstadt



Kesah
Schmitt



Kirsten
Bauer



Kurt
Wiersma



Lilly
Drew



Lina
Johnson



Linda
McDowell



Lydia
Kantor


 
Mark
Billmayer



Mathura
Shanmugasundaram



Matt
Hilden



Matt
Lindquist



Megan
Adelman



Nicole
Tarantino



Ryan
Gregg



Preston
Anderson



Steve
Sheldon














Our company

About us
Leadership
Board members
Advisors
Team
Careers



Connect

News & Events
Sign-up for updates









Legal

Terms of service
Privacy policy
Licenses and certifications







            © 2017 ONEOME and RIGHTMED are registered trademarks of OneOme, LLC in the United States and other countries. All Rights Reserved.
          

            OneOme prohibits downloading, republication, retransmission, reproduction or other use of the images contained in this website as stand-alone files.
          










Invenshure LLC: Company Profile - Bloomberg



































































  









Feedback























invenshure llc
Private Company









Company Profile
Sector: Financials
Industry: Asset Management
Sub-Industry: Investment Companies





Corporate Information
Address:



Phone:
-


Fax:
-























From The Web












Sponsored Financial Commentaries







More From The Web


















Home


News


Top Headlines
Most Popular
Exclusive
Law
Entrepreneurs
Leaders
Economy
Environment
Science
Sports
Markets Magazine
Pursuits Magazine
Bloomberg Visual Data
Bloomberg Best (and Worst)
For comments or complaints about news coverage click here


Regions
U.S.
China
Europe
Asia
U.K. & Ireland
Australia & New Zealand
Canada
India & Pakistan
Japan
Africa
Eastern Europe
Latin America
Middle East
Markets
Commodities
Currencies
Bonds
Stocks
Energy Markets
Municipal Bonds
Emerging Markets
Funds
Islamic Finance
Industries
Energy
Technology
Real Estate
Finance
Health Care
Transportation
Insurance
Retail
Media
Manufacturing




Quick


Market Data


Stocks
Stock Futures
World Indexes
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Gainers & Losers
Earnings Calendar
Industry Leaders
Currencies
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Foreign Exchange Cross Rates
FX Fixings
Currency Converter
Forex Trading Videos
Commodities
Energy Prices
Metals Prices
Agricultural Prices


Rates & Bonds
US Treasuries
UK Gilts
Germany Bunds
Japan Bonds
Australia Bonds
Bloomberg Bond Indexes
Corporate Bonds
Consumer Rates
Economic Calendar
Watchlist
European Debt Crisis
Symbol Search
The Market Now




Personal Finance


Top Headlines
Saving & Investing
Real Estate
Retirement Planning
Financial Advisers
Taxes
Blog: Ventured & Gained
Real Cost Of
Money Gallery
Calculators
Watchlist (Portfolio Tracker)




Tech


Top Headlines
Social Media
Mobile & Wireless
Web
Enterprise Tech
TV, Games & Movies
Apple
Tech Deals
Global Tech
Slideshows
Videos




U.S. Politics


Sustainability


Top Headlines
Energy
Corporate Sustainability
Policy
Natural Resources
Health & Population
Slideshows
Videos
Blog: The Grid




Luxury


Top Headlines
Autos
Billionaires
Living
Property
Travel
Well Spent
Loot Blog
Pursuits Magazine
Videos




TV


Live TV
Channel Finder
Personalities
Apple TV
iPad App
Schedule
U.S.
Asia
Europe


Shows
Surveillance
Market Makers
Lunch Money
Street Smart
Bloomberg West
Game Changers




Video


Must See
Latest
Live TV
Shows
Playlist




Radio


Live Radio
Shows
Schedule
Personalities
Podcasts
Bloomberg Brief
Featured Podcasts and New Shows
Bloomberg View
Masters in Business
First Word
Surveillance
Bloomberg Advantage
In the Loop
Bloomberg Law
Taking Stock
Bloomberg Best
More Podcasts




Blogs


Global Tech
The Grid
Loot
The Market Now
Political Capital
Tech Deals
Ventured and Gained




Opinion




My Saved



Registration



Sign In



Bloomberg.com



Businessweek.com



Company



About
Blog
Careers
Diversity & Inclusion
News Mission
Philanthropy & Engagement
Press Room
Procurement
Sustainability




Products



Financial Products
Bloomberg Professional Service
Bloomberg Anywhere
Bloomberg Tradebook
Bloomberg Briefs
Bloomberg Indexes
Bloomberg SEF
Service Center
Customer Support
Enterprise Products
Enterprise Solutions
Trading Solutions
Industry Products
Bloomberg BNA
Bloomberg Government
Bloomberg Law
Bloomberg Link
Bloomberg New Energy Finance
Bloomberg Sports
Content Licensing




Bloomberg Anywhere



Mobile Apps



Bloomberg Visual Data




































Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft


























































Home
All News
All Events










        WE BUILD COMPANIES
        TO CHANGE THE WORLD
        











CATEGORIES
All Events
All News
Flywheel
Imbio
Invenshure
OneOme

 HEADQUARTERS 

T
 612.506.1234


E
info@invenshure.com



 277 Colfax Avenue North
             Suite 148
             Minneapolis, MN 55405




OneOme announces agreement with ProZed Pharmacy Solutions
PARTNERSHIP IS PERSONALIZED MEDICINE COMPANY’S FIRST ENTRY INTO CANADIAN RETAIL PHARMACY MARKET
Posted July 26, 2017

Minneapolis, Minnesota; North Bay, Ontario (July 26, 2017) – A new partnership between OneOme and ProZed Pharmacy Solutions brings the power of personalized medicine to Canada. Minnesota-based OneOme will provide its RightMed® pharmacogenomics platform exclusively to customers of ProZed Pharmacy Solutions at Northern Shores Pharmacy in North Bay, Ontario as the first step in a nationwide launch. The partnership is the precision medicine company’s first entry into the Canadian retail 
Read More…

OneOme Forges Partnership with Total Quality Medicine
Agreement will Bring OneOme’s Pharmacogenomic Testing to Patients in Mexico
Posted July 13, 2017

MINNEAPOLIS, MEXICO CITY (July 13, 2017) – Pharmacogenomics leader OneOme today announced it has forged a partnership with Mexico City-based Total Quality Medicine (TQM). The agreement will bring OneOme’s pharmacogenomic (PGx) testing and support services to patients in Mexico, as TQM incorporates OneOme’s RightMed PGx test into its GeneTest line of personalized medicine products. OneOme is a Minneapolis-based leader in pharmacogenomic testing and clinical support tools that help physicians customize 
Read More…

OneOme Releases Product Updates to Improve Provider Experience
MAKES IMPROVEMENTS TO ORDERING PORTAL, TEST REPORTS AND RIGHTMED ADVISOR TO OPTIMIZE USER EXPERIENCE, EFFECTIVENESS
Posted June 28, 2017

MINNEAPOLIS (June 15, 2017) – OneOme today launched a product update that makes improvements to its RightMed® pharmacogenomic test workflow, report and interactive application. OneOme’s updates incorporate customer feedback to optimize its product, with the goal of bringing the power of pharmacogenomics into everyday clinical care. “OneOme is continually improving our products to fulfill our core mission of making affordable pharmacogenomic testing widely available and clinically relevant,” Paul Owen, CEO 
Read More…

OneOme Collaborates on Nation’s Largest Population-Based Pharmacogenomics Study
RIGHT 10K STUDY MEASURES IMPACT OF PHARMACOGENOMICS ON HEALTH AND ECONOMIC OUTCOMES
Posted June 1, 2017

MINNEAPOLIS (May 31, 2017) – Pharmacogenomic company OneOme announced today it is working with leading health institutions on the nation’s largest population-based pharmacogenomics study. Pharmacogenomics is an emerging field that combines the study of how drugs affect our bodies (pharmacology) with the study of our genes and their functions (genomics). The study, developed and led by Mayo Clinic, is called the RIGHT 10K study and its purpose is to examine 
Read More…

Women’s Health Week Shines Light on New Area of Personalized Medicine

Posted May 12, 2017

MINNEAPOLIS (May 12, 2017) – National Women’s Health Week (May 14-20) is an important annual reminder for women to prioritize their health. Fortunately, a new area of personalized medicine called pharmacogenomics is helping women avoid and treat many top health issues. OneOme’s RightMed® pharmacogenomic test uses the power of DNA to predict which medications may work best for an individual patient – helping women avoid adverse drug reactions and better 
Read More…

OneOme Wins Eureka! Innovation Award

Posted May 12, 2017

MINNEAPOLIS (May 08, 2017) – Minneapolis-based pharmacogenomics company OneOme today announced it has earned a 2017 Eureka Innovation Award from the Minneapolis / St. Paul Business Journal. The Eureka Innovation awards recognize game-changing companies across Minnesota industries. OneOme earned this recognition due to its groundbreaking product that brings routine pharmacogenomic testing into medical clinics around the world, and integrates results into the patient’s medical record for years of more accurate, 
Read More…

Precision Medicine Event Features OneOme’s Director of Medical Affairs
MINNESOTA HEALTH CARE ROUNDTABLE TAKES PLACE APRIL 20TH FROM 1-4 P.M.
Posted May 12, 2017

MINNEAPOLIS (April 19, 2017) – Tomorrow, OneOme’s director of medical affairs Josiah Allen will join the Minnesota Health Care Roundtable on precision medicine. The panel, which includes local leaders in the field, takes place on Thursday, April 20, from 1 to 4 p.m. at the Downtown Minneapolis Hilton and Towers. The roundtable discussion aims to explore how technological and policy advancements can promote more precise medical treatments to improve health. 
Read More…

Right the first time: How a Minneapolis company uses DNA tests to limit the side effects of psychiatric meds

Posted April 5, 2017

MinnPost published an article recounting the story of how OneOme’s RightMed pharmacogenomic test helped identify an effective prescription treatment for a teenager struggling with mental health conditions. For 10 years Carly and her family searched for the right medications and doses for her anxiety, ADHD, and depression. This process caused adverse drug reactions that had mentally and physically debilitating effects on Carly’s childhood. When she was 17 years old, her 
Read More…

OneOme Receives Laboratory Clinical Certification from Five States
RIGHTMED TEST MITIGATES BARRIERS FOR IMPLEMENTING PHARMACOGENOMICS
Posted April 4, 2017

MINNEAPOLIS (March 27, 2017) – Pharmacogenomics company OneOme today announced the results of its clinician pharmacogenomic testing awareness survey. OneOme will formally share its findings at the Academy of Managed Care Pharmacy (AMCP) Managed Care & Specialty Pharmacy Annual Meeting, which begins March 27 in Denver. OneOme’s poster, Strategies for increasing clinician awareness of pharmacogenomic testing, will be presented on March 28, 2017 from 5:45-7:30 p.m. The study, conducted by 
Read More…

OneOme Shares Findings of Pharmacogenomics Awareness Survey
RIGHTMED TEST MITIGATES BARRIERS FOR IMPLEMENTING PHARMACOGENOMICS
Posted April 3, 2017

MINNEAPOLIS (March 27, 2017) – Pharmacogenomics company OneOme today announced the results of its clinician pharmacogenomic testing awareness survey. OneOme will formally share its findings at the Academy of Managed Care Pharmacy (AMCP) Managed Care & Specialty Pharmacy Annual Meeting, which begins March 27 in Denver. OneOme’s poster, Strategies for increasing clinician awareness of pharmacogenomic testing, will be presented on March 28, 2017 from 5:45-7:30 p.m. The study, conducted by 
Read More…



Older posts >













Invenshure - We build companies to change the world








































              Cells            

INTRODUCTION
SOLUTIONS
PARTNERS
COMPANIES
TEAM
CONTACT
NEWS






WE BUILD
COMPANIES TO
CHANGE
THE WORLD
At Invenshure, we turn hard problems into thriving companies. Applying the world’s leading institutional IP with business rigor, our very early-stage model brings success to the few and betterment to all.





NEXT
Close



















15




American physicians use technology that’s 
15 years old.
Read More






Harnessing IP from the Mayo Clinic & U of Michigan, we turn old methods into personalized medicine.
 
 







6B




6B people 
have mobile phones.
 
Only 4.5B 
have access to toilets. 
Read More





Tech moves at an incredible pace.
Uniting the internet of things with cloud computing, we create opportunities for business and people just as quickly. 







4B




Over 
4 billion 
prescriptions are filled each year in the US alone.¹ However, not all drugs are effective for all people. In fact, response rates for many drugs are only between 50-75%.²
Read More





The solution is here — in your DNA. OneOme identifies how a patient’s DNA may affect their response to drugs. OneOme: making prescriptions personal.
 
 
 
1) IMS Institute for Healthcare Informatics2) Spear BB, Heath-Chiozzi M, Huff J: Clinical application of pharmacogenetics. Trends Mol. Med.7, 201–204 (2001). 







12




Cancer patients often wait 
12 weeks 
to see if treatment is working.
Read More






can help determine if treatment is working within 48 hours. 












Our IP Partners





The world's leading institutions and minds
We nurture novel ideas and inventions, turning killer IP into powerful businesses.





















































Our Companies













Our in-house scientists and engineers develop original IP and augment existing ideas to accelerate and launch companies. Proven expertise and networks translate scientific discovery into commercial reality. Our unique strength is your secret weapon.


Our in-house scientists and engineers develop original IP and augment existing ideas to accelerate and launch companies. 











We take a standard MRI or CT scans and help doctors determine if your disease is getting better, getting worse or staying the same. Using medical imaging biomarkers, our cloud-based technologies provide reports that modernize cancer & COPD diagnosis and treatment as we know it.  For more information visit imbio.com.


We take a standard MRI or CT scans and tell doctors if your disease is getting better, getting worse or staying the same.











A leading developer of cloud-based solutions, we connect devices to the internet to allow remote control, monitoring and visual analytics. Fast. The One Platform™ seamlessly creates value with staggering ease and efficiency. Every organization has data that can be leveraged into powerful intelligence—why remain analog? For more information visit exosite.com.


A leading developer of cloud-based solutions, we connect devices to the internet to allow remote control, monitoring and visual analytics. Fast.











Invenshure applied its big-data analytic platform to tap Mayo Clinic's bioinformatic technology. The result: a pharmacogenomics company that personalizes the prescription and reduces the trial, error and dangers the market has been forced to swallow. We are making genetics the key to faster, safer and more effective drug therapy. For more information visit oneome.com.


A pharmacogenomics company that personalizes the prescription and reduces the trial, error and dangers the market has been forced to swallow.











Where the Invenshure model began and was proven. We identified, licensed and developed a breakthrough technology from the University of Minnesota, then got acquired by GE Healthcare in 2011. Our work allowed physicians to see the unseen in medical imaging while silencing the ominous sound of an MRI. 


Our work allowed physicians to see the unseen in medical imaging while silencing the ominous sound of an MRI. 




Logic PD


Logic PD


We built it, they came. Complete product innovation and realization for connected devices in the world’s most demanding markets.  Identify, integrate, reduce risks, control costs and get to market faster. 


Complete product innovation and realization for connected devices in the world’s most demanding markets. Identify, integrate, reduce risks, control costs and get to market faster.











A young and innovative company, we are building a software platform to enable scalable and effective data and algorithm sharing between scientific research groups worldwide. We help scientists do great work together by allowing them to concentrate on the science, not the IT. For more information visit flywheel.io.


A young and innovative company, we are building a software platform to enable scalable and effective data and algorithm sharing between scientific research groups worldwide.











Harnessing the power of protein dimerization to create novel oncolytic immunotherapies. Our technologies are particularly suited for adoptive T cell therapies, a burgeoning area of oncology offering a viable alternative to surgery, radiation and chemotherapy for a variety of Cancers.  For more information visit tychonbio.com.


Harnessing the power of protein dimerization to create novel oncolytic immunotherapies.  Visit tychonbio.com.




















Healthcare




Personalized Treatment/ Medicine




Internet of Things




Therapeutics




Bioinformatics




Genomics




Big Data Analytics




Engineering




Diagnostics




Cloud Computing




Targeted Therapies



















Healthcare




Personalized Treatment/ Medicine




Internet of Things




Therapeutics




Bioinformatics




Genomics




Big Data Analytics




Engineering




Diagnostics




Cloud Computing




Targeted Therapies



















            We seek opportunity in chaos & uncertainty. It's where real innovation lives.           








Our Process


























Our Team





Pragmatic business meets renegade science


We ran businesses before we could drive cars. We tinkered, hacked and built long before that.  As scientists and engineers, we lead hands-on. As entrepreneurs, we have a track record of commercializing discoveries, building businesses and creating shareholder value. 

Our braintrust of scientists, engineers and industry leaders shows up everyday to make a material difference in people's lives. 















Troy D Kopischke


                Co-Founder & Co-CEO                


"You cannot solve everything but you have to manage through anything. That's what separates great ideas from great companies.  Our comfort zone is controlled chaos.  It's where bigger opportunities are."


Danny J Cunagin


                Co-Founder & Co-CEO                


"My mantra is the journey is the juice. Exits are the natural byproduct of loving what we do.  We will keep solving the problem until it's done, but not at the expense of goodwill and fun."





Advisors & Staff





Advisors





                        Al Rehemtulla                                              
Professor and Director of the Molecular Imaging Division – U of MI Health System
Alnawaz is an Endowed Professor of Radiation Oncology and Director of the Molecular Imaging Division at the University of Michigan School of Medicine.  He has developed products in the fields of cancer and cardiovascular disease for twenty years and is a co-inventor on licensed patents from the University of Michigan. Alnawaz trained at the Scripps Research Institute and worked at the Genetics Institute, where he was involved in the development of protein therapeutics for Hemophilia A and B, both of which are in use clinically.
Next Bio






Al Rehemtulla





                        Benno Sand                                              
President – Strategic Vision LLC
Benno was the Executive Vice President, Business Development, Investor Relations and Secretary at FSI International, Inc. (NASDAQ: FSII), a global supplier of wafer-cleaning and resist-processing equipment and technology until he negotiated FSII's sale to Tokyo Electron Limited in August 2012.  Mr. Sand chaired the integration committee at TEL FSI from October 2012 until October 2013. During his tenure at FSII, he served in several executive, operations and financial management roles, including Executive Vice President, Chief Administrative Officer and Chief Financial Officer. He also served on the boards of several United States, Asia and European based subsidiaries of FSII, Apprecia Technology, Inc., the Company's Japanese distributor, and other privately-held companies. Throughout his career, Mr. Sand has served as a director of various public and private companies and several community organizations. He has extensive knowledge of the capital markets, corporate governance, mergers and acquisitions operations and accounting issues. Mr. Sand's 30 year career at FSII, combined with his experience as a board member of other public and private companies, brings to Invenshure the perspective of a leader facing internal as well as current external economic, social and governance issues.
Next Bio






Benno Sand





                        Bob Baumgartner                                              
Executive Chairman and CEO – Center for Diagnostic Imaging
Robert is the Executive Chairman for the Center for Diagnostic Imaging (CDI). He joined CDI in 2001 as Chief Executive Officer and led the organization through a period of growth, resulting in the addition of more than thirty-five new partnerships and the recently announced merger with Insight Imaging. Previously, he was Director and Chairman of the Association for Quality Imaging (AQI), Chief Executive Officer and Director of American Coating International, President and Chief Executive Officer of First Solar, and President of the Apogee Glass Group. Robert has a BBA in Accounting from the University of Notre Dame and is a CPA.
Next Bio






Bob Baumgartner





                        Brian Ross                                              
Professor of Radiology and Biological Chemistry - U of MI School of Medicine
Brian is a Professor of Radiology and Biological Chemistry at the University of Michigan School of Medicine. He has been active in technology development and implementation involving numerous clinical trials, has over 150 peer-reviewed publications, and is a co-inventor on the patents licensed by Imbio. Brian was recently elected as a Fellow of the International Society for Magnetic Resonance in Medicine and is currently serving on the Scientific Advisory Board for the Cambridge Research Institute. Brian has a Ph. D. in Biophysics from the University of California at Davis.
Next Bio






Brian Ross





                        Bruce Machmeier                                              
Partner – Oppenheimer Wolff & Donnelly, LLP
Bruce is a Partner at Oppenheimer Wolff & Donnelly, LLP. He regularly advises emerging businesses on equity and debt financing, strategic investments, acquisition and protection of intellectual property, and mergers and acquisitions.  Bruce has represented early stage technology companies in transactional matters for more than thirty years. He is listed in Best Lawyers “The Best Lawyers in America” and Chambers USA “America’s Leading Lawyers for Business.” He is also regularly named to Minnesota Law & Politics “Super Lawyers” list. Bruce has a BS in Business Administration from the University of Minnesota and a JD from Stanford University Law School.
Next Bio






Bruce Machmeier





                        Corey Wulf                                              
Orthopedic Surgeon 
Dr. Wulf is a fellowship trained Orthopedic Surgeon at Twin Cities Orthopedics and Clinical Instructor of Sports Medicine with Fairview/MOSMI Orthopedic Sports Medicine Fellowship.  Dr. Wulf completed his orthopedic training at the Mayo Clinic. Dr. Wulf is the author of multiple national and international peer reviewed articles and book chapters covering various topics related to orthopedics and sports medicine. He has been actively involved in innovation and product development as an investor, advisor, and inventor.
Next Bio






Corey Wulf





                        Devan Padmanabhan                                                 



Shareholder at Winthrop & Weinstine
Devan Padmanabhan is a highly experienced patent litigator who helps clients litigate and manage patent portfolios with national and international needs for more than 18 years. Devan’s significant experience includes patent litigation cases covering a wide range of technologies and industries, and crosses all intellectual property areas, including patent, copyright, unfair competition, trademark, and technology-based cases. As an electrical engineer and lawyer, Devan is able to maximize his technical, engineering, legal, and business acumen to the client’s advantage, both inside the courtroom and in the boardroom. Devan is a member of the Board of Directors of Winthrop & Weinstine.
Next Bio






Devan Padmanabhan 





                        Don Hamm                                              
Managing Director – Trio Strategic Advisors
Don is the Managing Director of Trio Strategic Advisors. Previously, Don was the President and CEO for Assurant Health and held executive positions with Blue Cross and Blue Shield of Wisconsin and Time Insurance Company. Don has a BS in Actuarial Science from Drake University and an MS in Health Care Management from the University of Wisconsin-Milwaukee. He is a Fellow of the Society of Actuaries (FSA) and a Member of the American Academy of Actuaries (AAA).
Next Bio






Don Hamm





                        Eduard Michel                                              
Medical Advisor
Eduard has served as Medical Advisor to Invenshure since October 2012. Until 2011, he was Co-Founder, Chief Medical Officer, and Director at the Virtual Radiologic Corporation. Previously, Eduard served as Assistant Professor of Radiology at the University of Minnesota and attending Neuroradiologist at Hennepin County Medical Center and North Memorial Medical Center. He has authored more than sixty scientific articles and presented more than forty-five scientific seminars at medical conferences around the world. Eduard completed his education at the University of Minnesota and his Radiology residency and Neuroradiology fellowship at the University of Minnesota Hospital. 
Next Bio






Eduard Michel





                        Jef Flemmer                                              
Partner - McGladrey
Jef is a Tax Partner in the Twin Cities office of McGladrey with over 28 years’ experience as a business advisor and tax professional. Jef works with clients in the information technology and medical technology industries. He assists clients with tax planning in a number of areas, including tax minimization, integrated tax strategies to coordinate the tax plans of the organization and its owners, and assisting management in understanding the tax implications of business decisions and transactions. He also has significant experience working with companies financed through private equity, venture capital and SEC registrants.
Jef also participated in McGladrey’s Business Advisor Program, which was developed in concert with the University of Chicago to provide high-level business advice to clients. Combined with his experience, this program allows Jef to provide a unique perspective in helping clients increase stakeholder value.
Next Bio






Jef Flemmer





                        Jeremy Friese                                              
Senior Medical Director – Mayo Clinic
Jeremy is an Interventional Radiologist at the Mayo Clinic. His clinical and research focus includes minimally invasive vascular disease and cancer. Jeremy also serves as Senior Medical Director for New Ventures and Business Development at the Center for Individualized Medicine and as Associate Chair of finance in the Department of Radiology. He was Chair of Novation’s Imaging Council and currently sits on the Cardiovascular Council. Jeremey is Co-Founder of Evidentia Health (a seed-stage HIT company), an active angel investor, and board member for SV Biosystems, Inc. Jeremy has an MD from Mayo Medical School and an MBA from Harvard Business School.
Next Bio






Jeremy Friese





                        Mark Simenstad                                              
Vice President and Head of Fixed Income Funds and Separate Accounts
Mark is the Vice President and Head of Fixed Income Funds at Thrivent Asset Management. Previously, he was Vice President and Portfolio Manager at Investment Advisers Inc., and Chief Investment Officer of Fixed Income at Voyageur Asset Management. Mark has a BS in Economics from St. Olaf and an MBA from the University of Minnesota. He is also a Chartered Financial Analyst (CFA).
Next Bio






Mark Simenstad





                        Matthew Peterson                                              
CEO of Ancillary and Individual and the Chief Administrative Officer of UnitedHealthcare Employer and Individual Segment
Matthew Peterson is the CEO of Ancillary and Individual and the Chief Administrative Officer of UnitedHealthcare Employer and Individual segment, a $46 billion dollar business of UnitedHealth Group. He is also the President of the UnitedHealthcare Children’s Foundation, a 501c(3) public charity dedicated to advancing health care to underprivileged children in the United States. He sits on the board of Make-A-Wish of Minnesota. Mr. Peterson holds a Bachelor of Arts degree in Economics and Management from Hamline University in St. Paul, Minnesota and a Master of Business Administration degree from Vanderbilt University.
Next Bio






Matthew Peterson





                        Michael Garwood                                              
Radiology Professor - University of Minnesota
Michael Garwood, Ph.D. is a Professor in the Department of Radiology and Associate Director of the Center for Magnetic Resonance Research, at the University of Minnesota, where he has been for the past 28 years.  He holds the Lillian Quist – Joyce Henline Chair in Biomedical Research.  Dr. Garwood was educated at the University of California, Santa Cruz, where he received bachelor’s degrees in biology and chemistry in 1981, and a Ph.D. in chemistry in 1985. He has many awards and honors, including the Gold Medal from the International Society of Magnetic Resonance in Medicine.  Dr. Garwood has published more than 180 scientific papers and is an inventor on 17 patents.
Next Bio






Michael Garwood





                        Mike Harsh                                              
Vice President & Chief Technology Officer - GE Healthcare (Retired)
Mike is a Limited Partner at Golden Angel Investors and the co-founder of Terapede Systems, a digital x-ray detector startup. He is also a member of the Board of Directors of FloDesign Sonics, a company that utilizes ultrasound for bioprocess filtration; and Endra, a company that has unique technology for thermoacoustic enhanced ultrasound imaging. In addition, Mike is a member of the Scientific Advisory Board of Phoenix Nuclear Labs as well as a consultant to start-ups in the medical device industry. 

Mike was previously with GE before retiring in January 2015 after a 35-year career. Most recently, he served as GE Healthcare’s Vice President and Chief Technology Officer, leading the global Science and Technology Organization and its research and development teams in diagnostics, healthcare IT, and life sciences.

In 2008, Mike was elected to the American Institute for Medical and Biological Engineering College of Fellows for his significant contributions to the medical and biological engineering field.

Next Bio






Mike Harsh





                        Mike Steinhauser                                              
CEO / Chairman 3B Group LLC
Mike is Chairman and CEO of 3B Group LLC, a private holding company for healthcare ventures.  3B Group currently is engaged in the durable medical business, owning Corner Home Medical as well as Pacent Solutions, a wound management technology platform. The group has a startup pharmaceutical purchasing platform for independent pharmacies to optimize their purchases, and they recently divested their Merwin Long Term Cary Pharmacy business with a sale to CVS Health.  Mike has been in the pharmacy business for over 35 years and currently is Chairman of North Memorial Healthcare, Chairman of the Jack Jablonski Believe in Miracles Foundation, and past Chairman for Independent Pharmacy Cooperative, a coop of over 4,000 independent pharmacies with purchases of $6 billion.  Mike has a bachelor’s degree from the University of Minnesota.

Next Bio






Mike Steinhauser





                        Paul Dominski                                              
President - River Bet Consulting
Paul is the President of River Bet Consulting. He is a leading authority on building organizations that deliver outstanding results and his specialization is in leadership coaching, organizational effectiveness, and strategy formation and implementation. Previously, Paul was the Senior Vice President of US Human Resources at Best Buy, Chief Human Resource and Chief Marketing Officer at Park Nicollet Health, and Vice President of Organization Effectiveness and Chief Learning Officer at Target. Paul has a BA from the University of Michigan and an MBA from the University of Minnesota – Carlson School of Management.
Next Bio






Paul Dominski





                        Paul Koch                                              
Senior Vice President of Wealth Management and Senior Portfolio Manager - UBS
Paul is the Senior Vice President of Wealth Management and Senior Portfolio Manager and Wealth Advisor for UBS. He is also the registered financial advisor for the NFL Players Association and serves on the Board of Trustees for Gustavus Adolphus College, Board of Directors for the Economic Club of Minnesota, Board of Directors for the Junior Achievement of the Upper Midwest, and Board of Directors for the Interfaith Outreach and Community Partners. Paul has a BA in Business Administration and Political Science from Gustavus Adolphus College.
Next Bio






Paul Koch





                        Russ Swansen                                              
Chief Investment Officer – Thrivent Asset Management
Russell is the Chief Investment Officer at Thrivent Asset Management.  He oversees all of Thrivent Financial’s investments, including mutual funds, variable products, and the general account. Previously, Russell was a Managing Director at Colonnade Advisors, President of Prudential Portfolio Managers (PPM) America, a member of the Management Committee and Board of Directors of PPM (London), chairman of PPM (Canada), and a Portfolio Manager and Executive at Washington Square Capital. Russell has a BA in Business and Economics from Gustavus Adolphus College and an MBA from the University of Minnesota Graduate School of Business.
Next Bio






Russ Swansen





                        Tom Gilbert                                              
Chief Clinical Officer – Center for Diagnostic Imaging
Thomas is the Chief Clinical Officer at the Center for Diagnostic Imagine (CDI). He is a practicing radiologist with subspecialty expertise in pain management and spine, body, and musculoskeletal imaging. Thomas has a longstanding interest and experience in health policy and management, having served for nine years on guideline development committees at NASS and ICS, worked on appropriateness initiatives for high-tech imaging at CDI and ICSI, and worked on care coordination initiatives at CDI and the MMA. Thomas has a BS in Biology, Biochemistry, and Chemical Engineering from MIT, an MD from Harvard Medical School, and an MPP in Health Care Policy and Management from Harvard University.
Next Bio






Tom Gilbert





                        Tom Vanderheyden                                              
Vice President of Business Development and Commercialization - UnitedHealthcare
Tom Vanderheyden is Vice President, Business Development and Commercialization. Tom joined UnitedHealth Group in 2003. He has held leadership roles as Vice President of Global Operations while living in Gurgaon, India, Chief Operations Officer at UnitedHealth International, VP of Mergers and Acquisitions, and VP of Business Development. Tom’s twenty year career prior to UnitedHealth Group included systems engineering and sales responsibilities at IBM, creating an IT infrastructure outsourcing business within a publicly held IT staffing firm in Chicago, managing a Midwest regional technology and business consulting company and raising venture capital as Chief Operations Officer of an early stage software business. Tom holds a Bachelors degree in Organizational Management and Communications and an M.B.A. in Global Management.
Next Bio






Tom Vanderheyden






Staff







                        Andy Altepeter                                              
Chief Software Architect 
Andy joined Invenshure as the Chief Software Architect in July 2012. Previously, Andy worked as Manager of Web Development at Bethel University, Web Developer for Infrae, and Unix Administrator/PC Analyst for the University of North Dakota. Andy has a B.A. in Computer Science and Mathematics from the University of North Dakota.
Next Bio






Andy Altepeter





                        Annie McShane                                              
Investor Relations
Annie joined Invenshure as the Marketing Coordinator in October 2012, then took on the role of Investor Relations in 2015. Previously, she worked as a Product Specialist at Hemosphere, Inc. and Marketing Associate at Steady State Imaging. Annie has a B.S. in Marketing from Villanova University.
Next Bio






Annie McShane





                        Ashley Ancona                                                



Program Manager
Ashley joined Invenshure as a Program Manager in September 2016 after spending a year serving abroad with The World Race.  She graduated from Bethel University with a B.A. in both Computer Science Software Project Management and Business Entrepreneurship.  Outside of work, she enjoys traveling, running, hiking and exploring new coffee shops with friends.  
Next Bio






Ashley Ancona





                        Can "John" Akgun                                              
Business Development Manager 
Can 'pronounced John' joined Invenshure as a Business Development Manager in July 2013 and is responsible for creating and deploying operational strategies for Invenshure and its portfolio companies. Can is also the Director of Business Development at Invenshure's subsidiary company, Imbio. Previously, he was the Head of Sales and Business Development at Zurich MedTech in Zurich, Switzerland.  Can has a B.S. and an M.S. in Electrical Engineering focused on RF/Microwave design from the University of Minnesota and a Ph.D. in Biomedical Engineering focused on high field MRI instrumentation design from the Center for Magnetic Resonance Research (CMRR) at the University of Minnesota.
Next Bio






Can "John" Akgun





                        David Hannes                                              
Imbio COO
David Hannes is the Chief Operating Officer of Imbio, having joined in April, 2015. He brings nearly 20 years of experience across Operations, as well as Business Development and Strategy in medical device business to the Imbio team. Prior to joining Imbio, Mr. Hannes was Vice President of Business Development for NeuWave Medical, a microwave ablation start-up based out of Madison, Wisconsin. Mr. Hannes joined NeuWave in its second year of commercial sales and was a key member of the leadership team which built the company into the market leader in microwave ablation, including gaining broad acceptance across the nation’s Top 50 cancer centers. Mr. Hannes led NeuWave’s Business Development and Strategy, corporate contracting and Marketing during this rapid transition from start-up to growth business. Prior to Neuwave, Mr. Hannes spent more than 14 years at GE Healthcare across a variety of operational and commercial leadership positions including Corporate Purchasing, Commercial Operations, Finance, and Global Service P&L leadership. Early in his career, Mr. Hannes was a manager in Ford Motor’s Corporate Purchasing group where he built his global commercial, strategy and lean manufacturing/operations experience. Mr. Hannes has a B.S. in Business from The University of Dayton and an MBA from the University of Madison – Wisconsin.
Next Bio






David Hannes





                        Elisa Poquette                                              
Lead User Experience Architect
Elisa joined Invenshure in January 2015 as a Lead User Experience Architect. She is responsible for crafting usable, useful, and desirable products and services for our portfolio of companies. Previously Elisa worked as a UX consultant and is a Returned Peace Corps Volunteer. She holds a B.A. from St. Olaf College where she studied the social sciences, business and art history. 
Next Bio






Elisa Poquette





                        Erik Anderson                                              
Director of Information Systems 
Erik joined Invenshure as Director of Information Systems in November 2011 and employs his broad expertise in a variety of technology fields such as network design/engineering, large-scale storage systems, virtualization, systems security, and systems automation/orchestration. Previously, he held systems administration roles for a medical insurance provider, medium-sized higher-education institution, and an engineering design service company. Erik has a B.S. in Computer Science from Bethel University.
Next Bio






Erik Anderson





                        Imad B. Nijim                                                



Flywheel COO
Imad is the Chief Operating Officer of Flywheel. Previously, he held executive and senior management positions with Lexmark Healthcare, Acuo Technologies, and ScImage. Imad has extensive services and operations experience in healthcare informatics, enterprise imaging, data sharing and interoperability in multiple clinical disciplines. Imad holds a B.A. in Mathematics and an MBA in Healthcare Management.
Next Bio






Imad B. Nijim





                        Jennifer Reiter                                              
Associate Research Scientist
Jennifer joined Invenshure in June 2012 as an Associate Research Scientist. With a B.S. in Physics and a B.A. in Mathematics from Bethel University, Jennifer’s focus is in imaging and computer programming. Outside of the office, Jennifer enjoys the outdoors, cooking and CrossFitting. 
Next Bio






Jennifer Reiter





                        Jeno Varga                                              
General Manager - Invenshure Hungary
Jeno launched and leads our Invenshure Hungary Research and Development Operations. Jeno has supported Invenshure's development team as a Principal Engineer since 2010, providing deep technical experience in IT, medical and industrial projects. Jeno has decades of experience in product development from technical concept to production quality design. Previously, Jeno was a Senior Electrical Engineer at Logic PD, serving as the General Manager of Logic's Hungary Research and Development team. Prior to Logic PD, he worked for Sun Microsystems in the UK. Jeno has a M.S. Engineering focused on Electrical Engineering from Technical University of Budapest.
Next Bio






Jeno Varga





                        Jeremy Friese                                              
Chief Medical Officer and Fund II Managing Partner
Jeremy is Chief Medical Officer at Invenshure and is managing partner of Invenshure Fund II. He helped launch OneOme for which he now serves as a director. He is an active investor and board member in the diagnostics and genomics arenas. Previously, he founded Evidentia Health, a health IT company focused on diagnostic reporting. Jeremy was an interventional radiologist at Mayo Clinic where he also served as Associate Chair of the Department of Radiology and ran business development for Mayo Global Business Solutions. Jeremy earned his MD at Mayo Medical School and completed surgery and radiology training at Mayo Clinic and Harvard Medical School. He earned his MBA from Harvard Business School.
Next Bio






Jeremy Friese





                        Joe Schneider                                              
Senior Software Engineer
Joe joined Invenshure as a Senior Software Engineer in April 2015 and works for portfolio companies doing full-stack web development and embedded device prototyping. Previously, Joe held development, leadership, and agile coaching positions at Logic PD and John Deere. Joe holds a BS in Electrical Engineering from North Dakota State University and a MS in Computer Engineering from Iowa State University.
Next Bio






Joe Schneider





                        Lina Johnson                                              
Software Engineer
Lina joined Invenshure in March 2015 as a Software Development intern, then transitioned into a full-time Software Developer in May 2016. She graduated from Augsburg College with a B.S. in Computer Science and a minor in Mathematics.  At Invenshure, she is responsible for developing and maintaining all of the portfolio sites.
Next Bio






Lina Johnson





                        Luke Buer                                              
Embedded Systems Engineer
Luke joined Invenshure as a Embedded Systems Engineer in December 2014 and works on technology concept ideation, creation of functional prototypes, and assessing investment opportunities. He also consults and assists Invenshure's portfolio companies. Previously, Luke was an Electrical Engineer II at Logic PD. Luke has a B.S. in Electrical Engineering from the University of Minnesota and a B.A. in Physics from Bethel University.
Next Bio






Luke Buer





                        Mark Sylvester                                              
CFO
Mark joined Invenshure in January 2015 and is currently the CFO for Invenshure and its early-stage portfolio companies.  Previously, Mark was the CFO at The Emily Program where he oversaw Accounting, Finance, Payroll and Financial Analytics.  During his tenure, Mark sat on the Board of Directors, was a member of the Sr. Leadership Team, structured a debt and equity recapitalization and was instrumental in business development during a period of rapid growth.  Before that, he was an institutional consultant at Morgan Stanley.  Mark received his J.D. from the University of St. Thomas School of Law and B.A. from Saint John’s University.
Next Bio






Mark Sylvester





                        Matt Lindquist                                              
Finance
Matt joined Invenshure in May 2014 after completing his B.S. in Finance from Minnesota State University, Mankato. Matt currently works with Invenshure and its portfolio companies on creating financial models and assisting in business development. Matt's interests outside of the office include playing sports, traveling, and reading.
Next Bio






Matt Lindquist





                        Mary Lowe                                              
Administrator 
Mary joined Invenshure as an Administrator in November 2011. Previously, Mary was involved in administrative positions that included interaction with the public, which she very much enjoys. Mary has always lived in the Twin Cities and surrounding suburbs.  She enjoys traveling, although she prefers to stay close to her Minnesota home and her family.
Next Bio






Mary Lowe





                        Nathaniel Kofalt                                              
Infrastructure Engineer
Nathaniel joined Invenshure as an Infrastructure Engineer in February 2015, and can generally be found using idealistic goals to build pragmatic solutions. Historically, Nathaniel has gravitated to wherever the hardest problems can be found, and Invenshure is no exception. Nathaniel has previously worked on next-generation education initiatives, automated infrastructure compliance, and generally fighting for a healthier, more robust industry.
Next Bio






Nathaniel Kofalt





                        Rosie Dryden                                              
Senior Accountant 
Rosie joined Invenshure as its Accountant in 2012.  She currently works with the accounting team for Invenshure and its portfolio companies.  Previously, Rosie provided accounting services for non-profit and for profit organizations in the Twin Cities.  She obtained her B.A. in Sociology Metropolitan State University and is pursuing a Masters of Accounting at St. Mary’s University.
Next Bio






Rosie Dryden





                        Ryan Chamberlain                                              
Director of Research and Development
Ryan joined Invenshure in early 2012 and is currently the Director of Research and Development for Invenshure and two of its portfolio companies, Flywheel and Imbio. Previously, Ryan was a Research Associate/Assistant Professor at the University of Minnesota where he created novel MRI acquisition and reconstruction techniques. Ryan has a B.S. in Physics from the University of Minnesota, a Master of Information and Data Science from the University of California, Berkeley, and a Ph.D. in Medical Physics from the University of Minnesota.
Next Bio






Ryan Chamberlain





                        Steve Sheldon                                              
Systems Administrator 
Steve Sheldon is a jack-of-all-trades that has been with Invensure for 4 years. At present, he is managing multiple businesses and non-profits to serve their technology needs.  Steve has an M.A. in Higher Education, and came from a background working with college students at both Bethel University and Geneva College, but his passion was always dabbling in the IT world.  He started his career in IT with Logic Product Development in 2005, and has been working with Danny and Troy ever since.  One thing you may not know about Steve is that he did an ‘Around the World’ Trip with his wife 10 years ago, traveling to 23 countries over 10 months
Next Bio






Steve Sheldon




















            This work demands curiosity, courage and perseverance          

            Minneapolis          





Close










Contact





Let's build something great together



MINNEAPOLIS, MN 

T
612.520.7361


E

info@invenshure.com




807 Broadway St NE
Suite 350

Invenshure
Minneapolis,
                  MN
55413




CAMBRIDGE, MA 


One Broadway 14th Floor 
Cambridge, MA 02142




BUDAPEST, HUNGARY
VISIT SITE

T
+36 30 696 3691


E

hungary@invenshure.com




Floor 3., 50-52. Fehérvári Street
Budapest, H-1117 Hungary





Join us! We are looking for:



Full Stack Web Developer (Budapest)









Copyright © 2017 Invenshure


Fractal Image by Wolfgang Beyer. Modified from original.







Close
















	Inventures > About us




























































































 



  










































About Inventures





























Inventures offers companies, standard-setting organizations and user/development communities access to the world's pre-eminent technology community professionals and solutions. We help you advance emerging and existing technologies by creating and managing ecosystems, driving stakeholder collaboration and building new markets. Whatever your goals, we can provide a customizable set of resources that are unmatched in the industry, and our business practices and approaches provide the expertise, speed and leverage to help your organization achieve its vision. 
 
We are the only company that can provide the customizable solutions necessary to help you achieve objectives across the life-cycle spectrum of any given technology or ecosystem. Our expertise ranges from creating startup consortia and standard-setting organizations to managing user/development communities. You'll do more with Inventures. 
 
 
Want to know more?



























The Management Team






David Schmahl
President, Inventures

David Schmahl's experience combines deep association management expertise with a background in both a tech-driven media start-up and a Fortune 50 corporation. He serves as president of Inventures, where he is responsible for strategy, service delivery and performance, and new client development.


As a wholly owned subsidiary of SmithBucklin, the association management and services company more organizations turn to than any other, Inventures client organizations have access to capabilities unmatched in the industry. In addition to his role as president of Inventures, David also serves as chief executive of SmithBucklin's Technology Industry Practice, which serves technology-focused associations and user communities and delivers extraordinary value to tech users, companies and industry partners.


David holds a Bachelor of Arts in economics from Miami University, Oxford, Ohio.









Deepak Kamlani
Founder, Inventures

As the founder of Inventures, Deepak Kamlani has been working with technology leaders for more than 25 years to help them expand existing, or establish new, markets and business ecosystems by building multi-stakeholder alliances focused on innovation and new technology.


Deepak has deep experience in P&L management, marketing, product development/management, and corporate and business development with leading U.S., European, and Japanese high-tech companies.


Deepak founded Inventures after the company he worked for previously, Centex Telemanagement, Inc., was acquired by MFS Communications. Prior to Centex, he was responsible for business development, technology transfer, and strategic ventures for NTT America, Inc., and served as Vice President of Marketing and Sales for Votrax, Inc., a supplier of integrated CTI equipment. Earlier positions include Toshiba America's telecommunications systems division, where he led the marketing team; Fujitsu GTE Business Systems, where he was responsible for developing networked voice/data products; and GTE Corporation, where, among other projects, he participated in a corporate development team involved in the acquisition of Sprint Communications. He began his career with a division of ITT Corporation in the U.K. (STC, later ICL and Northern Telecom).


Deepak was educated at The Doon School in India. He graduated with an Honors degree in Physical Chemistry from University College, University of London, and an M.S. in Management from The Imperial College, also at the University of London. He serves on the advisory boards of start-ups, provides advisory services to venture capital firms, and is a frequent speaker at technology events worldwide.









Darrell Garner
Vice President, Relationship Management

Darrell has a wealth of executive experience from services and technology companies. Following early stints in technology development roles with large telecom companies such as Pacific Bell, Darrell was President/CEO of Creative Computer Solutions, Inc. an Enterprise Resource Planning and Customer Relations Management software provider. Here he developed and directed all strategic initiatives including Customer Service, Training, Professional Services, Operations, and Software Development. As Principal Consultant at Taydan, LLC he was responsible for IT/ERP Solutions, Project/Program Management, Customer Support, Education and Training, Professional Services, Operational and Organizational Development, and Vendor Relationship Management. He was then at Xintex where he focused on streamlining development process, and driving channel strategies to support the transaction based business model, and at Loosehead Software, a mobile application start-up, where he was responsible for bringing a disruptive mobile platform to the mobile ecosystem through various partnerships and affiliations. Most recently Darrell was with Healy and Co, where he helped re-engineer various workflow, deployment and implementation programs to provide performance efficiencies.


Darrell holds a Bachelors degree in Economics from the University of California, Irvine and an MBA from Saint Mary's College, Moraga.








Lory Yeakle
Vice President, Operations and Client Services

Lory Yeakle has more than 20 years of experience in high tech and emerging technologies, providing thought leadership and management across all aspects of the product development lifecycle: strategy, business planning, software design and development, quality assurance, third party alliances, marketing, brand, and customer service.  She spent 17 years at IBM developing software systems, standards, and applications, working in partnership with the company's global sales team to promote and demonstrate the value of these emerging technologies to consumers and corporate customers.  Lory left IBM to accept an opportunity at Visa International, where she applied her technology experience and leadership to financial payment solutions.  She spent 13 years at Visa as a Sr. Vice President, developing B2B and e-commerce payment solutions, establishing a customer service division to deliver customer and member support, and growing acceptance of Visa payment technologies by demonstrating the value of emerging payment solutions through strategic merchant partnerships.


Lory graduated with high honors with a bachelors degree in Computer Science from the University of Florida. She also holds a patent for the development of an electronic B2B payment solution to support invoice driven payments.








Steve Crumb
Vice President, Executive Director

Steve Crumb joined Global Inventures after serving for five years as Executive Director and VP of Operations with the Open Grid Forum (formerly the Global Grid Forum). Steve provided strategic and tactical leadership, including facilitation of board, advisory and management steering committees. He managed alliance revenue generation, including a membership program, grants, and sponsorships.


Steve has spent more than 20 years with various high-tech companies, often applying leading-edge technologies to their business operations. As a Senior Systems Engineer at Convergys Corporation, he provided leadership to systems engineering and development teams exploring component-based development techniques. At Motorola, he worked in the corporate networking lab, serving as a test engineer for internetworking equipment and architecting many of Motorola’s first internetworks. At the National Center for Supercomputing Applications, he installed and managed industrial and academic networks and was involved in the Internet Engineering Task Force.


Steve holds a degree in Computer Science from Western Kentucky University.








Stan Moyer
Vice President, Executive Director

Stan Moyer has over 24 years of experience in the communications industry. He worked for 21 years in the Applied Research area of Telcordia Technologies, where he was the strategic research program manager responsible for overseeing Telcordia's long-range R&D  program and helping to monetize its output. Additionally, Stan was involved with research and business development activities related to Internet privacy, mobile messaging, digital content services and home networking. He has published over thirty technical articles in refereed journals and magazines and holds four patents..


Stan was president of the OSGi™ Alliance, an industry consortium creating specifications for the managed delivery of networked services, for five years and served on the board for an additional four years. He has held many volunteer leadership positions in the IEEE Communications Society and other parts of the IEEE during the past 15 years. Currently he is Treasurer and a member of the Board of Governors.


At Inventures, Stan serves as the Executive Director for ONVIF, OVCC, SD Card Association, and the Smart TV Alliance.


Stan received an M.E. degree in electrical engineering from the Stevens Institute of Technology, an MBA in Technology Management from the University of Phoenix, and a B.S. degree in Engineering Physics from the University of Maine.








Kevin Schader
Vice President, Executive Director

As Vice President and Executive Director at Inventures, Kevin Schader works with a variety of consortia focused on technology, consumer electronics, and green power initiatives. He works side-by-side with consortia leadership, offering direction and counsel on a variety of strategic and operational issues.


Kevin has more than 20 years of technology experience and has an international public relations background, supporting a variety of industries including broadcast media, healthcare, security, telecommunications, and travel organizations. Past clients include EDS, Sabre Holdings, Fujitsu Network Communications, ADC, Narus, RCN, PHNS, JPS Healthcare System, GTE, ABS-CBN Global, DFW International Airport and T-Mobile Hot Spots.


Kevin graduated magna cum laude with a B.A. degree in Communications and International Studies from Southern Methodist University. He is also accredited in public relations by the Public Relations Society of America (PRSA). 








John Ehrig
Executive Director

John Ehrig is an Operations/Executive Director, working primarily with the OpenID Foundation (OIDF), Open Identity Exchange (OIX), the OSGi Alliance, and PC Gaming Alliance (PCGA). He works closely with the boards of these organizations to define and execute strategic programs. John also helps lead marketing and ecosystem development, and participates in technical, best practices, and baseline working groups, and anchors the Inventures' operational service.


John joined Inventures in 2004, serving as the Enterprise Grid Alliance (EGA) program manager. He participated in the merger of the Enterprise Grid Alliance with the Global Grid Forum, working on many aspects of structuring the new organization, the Open Grid Forum (OGF). He then served as OGF's enterprise program manager to foster adoption of grid technology in the enterprise data center.


Prior to joining Inventures, John worked as Director of Product Management for Symmetricom, the worldwide leader in telecommunications network synchronization equipment, where he led the development of a $30 million-per-year product line, and later headed the company’s corporate marketing department. Previously he served as Director of Marketing and Sales for Coastcom, a telecommunications equipment manufacturer.


John graduated with distinction from Pennsylvania State University with a B.S. degree in Business Administration. In his free time, John can be found roaming the mountains of the western U.S. in pursuit of his other passion, rock climbing.


























Alliance Management Services









Alliance Formation
Branding & Marketing
Certification Management Services
Committee Administration
Communications & PR
Executive Leadership
Financial Management
Member Meetings
Membership Recruitment
Membership Management
Program Management
Tradeshows & Events
Transition Services
Web & IT Services
Workgroup Collaboration
Business Operations Services


















We Make a Difference 








Our mission is to achieve the missions of the client organizations we serve. As a result, we make a meaningful difference by helping increase the reach and impact of technology solutions that are changing the ways people, businesses and future generations operate.



















 About 









About Us 
Management Team
Resources
Testimonials 
Contact us








Login









Contact Us








2400 Camino Ramon #375
San Ramon CA 94583 USA
T: +1.925.275.6690
F: +1.925.275.6691
www.inventures.com
Contact us











Copyright ©  2017  Global Inventures, Inc.
 Site Terms |  Privacy Policy




















Account Suspended






 Account Suspended
            





                        This Account has been suspended.
                    

                        Contact your hosting provider for more information.
                    





